Utah statutes.
49-21-201.   Program membership -- Eligibility.
(1)  The state shall cover all of its eligible employees under this chapter.
(2)  Public safety service employees, as defined in Sections 49-14-102,
49-15-102, and 49-23-102 shall be covered under this chapter or a
substantially similar long-term disability program in accordance with the
provisions of Section 49-14-601, 49-15-601, or 49-23-601.
(3)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, firefighter service employees, as defined in
Section 49-23-102, initially entering employment on or after July 1, 2011, and
volunteer firefighters, as defined in Section 49-23-102, shall be covered
under this chapter or a substantially similar long-term disability program in
accordance with the provisions of Section 49-23-601.
        (4)  Except as provided under Subsection (5), all other employers may
provide coverage for their eligible employees under this chapter.
(5)  If an employer elects to cover any of its eligible employees under this
chapter, all of its eligible employees shall be covered.
(6)  Except as provided under Subsections (1) and (2), nothing in this chapter
requires any employer to cover its eligible employees under this chapter.
(7)  The following employees are not eligible for coverage under this chapter:
(a)  firefighter service employees, as defined under Section 49-16-102, that
initially entered employment prior to July 1, 2011; and
(b)  legislators.
